Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-41] Payment for service or treatment
provided to a party or for a child's care, support, or treatment. (a)
Whenever a service or treatment is provided to a party, or whenever care,
support, or treatment of a child is provided under this chapter, the court may
order the payment of such expenses by the persons or legal entities who are
legally responsible for the same, after reasonable notice and hearing as the
court directs.

(b) The provisions of section 571-52 and all
other remedies available under the law shall be applicable to enforce orders
issued pursuant to this section. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next